Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB496.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 2011-B(e) of the act of March 10, 1949 (P.L.30, No.14), known as the Public School Code of 1949, is amended by adding a paragraph to read:Section 2011-B. School participation in program.* * *(e) Participating nonpublic school criteria.--The following criteria apply to a participating nonpublic school:* * *(4) The participating nonpublic school shall have a written policy that prohibits discrimination on the basis of gender identity or sexual orientation.12345678910111213141516171819 * * *Section 2. This act shall take effect immediately.20250SB0496PN0451 - 2 - 12